trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
    <pardef n="twenty__num"> <!-- per als 21 33 44 etc -->

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>unu</l>
          <r><b/>unu</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>du</l>
          <r><b/>du</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>tri</l>
          <r><b/>tri</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>kvar</l>
          <r><b/>kvar</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>kvin</l>
          <r><b/>kvin</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ses</l>
          <r><b/>ses</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>sep</l>
          <r><b/>sep</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ok</l>
          <r><b/>ok</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>nay</l>
          <r><b/>nay</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

    </pardef>








   

<pardef n="ha/ve__vbmod">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="want__vbmod">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="will/__vbmod">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="c/an__vbmod">

                             <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                           <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ould</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="/be_able_to__vbmod">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>be<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>are<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>am<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>is<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>were<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>been<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="dudek"><i>dudek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="tridek"><i>tridek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvardek"><i>kvardek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvindek"><i>kvindek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="sesdek"><i>sesdek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="sepdek"><i>sepdek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="okdek"><i>okdek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="naydek"><i>naydek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
